Nevada, session 83, AB295.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 687B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in NRS 687B.225 and sections 2 to 8,
inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in sections 3, 4 and 5 of this act have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Adverse determination” means a determination by a
health carrier that an admission, availability of care, continued
stay or other health care service that is a covered benefit has been
reviewed and, based on the information provided, does not meet
the health carrier’s requirements for medical necessity,
appropriateness, health care setting, level of care or effectiveness,
and the requested service or payment for the service is therefore
denied, reduced or terminated.
Sec. 4. “Health carrier” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 695G.024, and includes, without limitation, an organization
for dental care.
Sec. 5. “Insured” means a policyholder, subscriber, enrollee
or other person covered by a health carrier.
Sec. 6. 1. If a health carrier utilizes an artificial
intelligence system or an automated decision tool to process
requests for prior authorization, the health carrier shall transmit
to each of its insureds, in writing:
(a) A statement that the health carrier utilizes an artificial
intelligence system or automated decision tool to process requests
for prior authorization;
(b) A general description of how the artificial intelligence
system or automated decision tool works; and
(c) A description of the specific types of information or data
utilized by the artificial intelligence system or automated decision
tool to enable the system or tool to generate an outcome.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a health
carrier shall not utilize or employ an artificial intelligence system
or automated decision tool to:
(a) Make an adverse determination on a request for prior
authorization; or
(b) Terminate, reduce or modify coverage for medical or
dental care that was previously approved by the health carrier.
3. A health carrier may utilize or employ an artificial
intelligence system or automated decision tool for a purpose
described in subsection 2 if, when the artificial intelligence system
-
*AB295*

– 4 –
or automated decision tool generates an outcome on a request for
prior authorization described in subsection 2, the request for prior
authorization is independently reviewed by a physician or, for a
request for dental care, a dentist, who:
(a) Holds an unrestricted license to practice medicine or
dentistry, as applicable, in any state or territory of the United
States;
(b) Holds a current certification by a specialty board of the
American Board of Medical Specialties or, if a dentist, a certifying
board approved by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the
American Dental Association, in the area or areas appropriate to
the subject of the request; and
(c) Possesses the education, training and expertise to evaluate
the specific clinical issues involved in the request.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Artificial intelligence system” means a machine-based
system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make
predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or
virtual environments.
(b) “Automated decision tool” means an automated or
computerized system that is specifically developed or modified to
make, or to be a controlling factor in making, consequential
decisions.
Sec. 7. 1. On or before March 1 of each calendar year, a
health carrier shall compile and transmit to the Commissioner and
to the Director of the Department of Health and Human Services
a report containing the following information for the immediately
preceding calendar year:
(a) The total number of requests for prior authorization for
care provided in this State that were received by the health carrier.
(b) The average time that elapsed between the health carrier
receiving a request described in paragraph (a) and the health
carrier approving or making an adverse determination on the
request.
(c) The percentage and total number of requests for prior
authorization described in paragraph (a) that were approved upon
initial review.
(d) The percentage and total number of requests for prior
authorization described in paragraph (a) that resulted in an
adverse determination upon initial review.
(e) The percentage and total number of the adverse
determinations described in paragraph (d) that were appealed.
(f) The percentage and total number of appeals described in
paragraph (e) that resulted in the reversal of an adverse
determination.
-
*AB295*

– 5 –
2. The report compiled pursuant to subsection 1 must present
the information described in that subsection:
(a) In aggregated form; and
(b) Disaggregated by the types of care at issue in the requests
for prior authorization, which may include, without limitation,
mental health, chronic care, preventive services and dental care.
3. On or before April 1 of each calendar year, the Director of
the Department of Health and Human Services and the
Commissioner of Insurance shall publish the reports submitted
pursuant to subsection 1 for that calendar year on an Internet
website maintained by the Department or the Commissioner, as
applicable.
Sec. 8. 1. The Commissioner, in consultation with the
Director of the Department of Health and Human Services, shall
adopt any regulations that are necessary to carry out the
provisions of NRS 687B.225 and sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this
act.
2. The Commissioner may delegate to the Director of the
Department of Health and Human Services his or her authority
under this chapter to audit or investigate the compliance of a
health carrier with the provisions of NRS 687B.225 and sections 2
to 8, inclusive, of this act.
3. If an audit or investigation of a health carrier conducted
by the Director of the Department of Health and Human Services
causes the Director to believe that a health carrier has potentially
violated the provisions of NRS 687B.225 or sections 2 to 8,
inclusive, of this act, the Director shall immediately notify the
Commissioner of the potential violation and transmit to the
Commissioner any information collected as a part of the audit or
investigation.
4. If the Commissioner determines, after conducting a
hearing in accordance with NRS 679B.310 to 679B.370, inclusive,
that a health carrier has violated paragraph (b) or (c) of
subsection 2 of NRS 687B.225 or section 7 of this act, the
Commissioner shall assess the civil penalty described in subsection
5 for each such violation.
5. A civil penalty assessed against a health carrier pursuant
to subsection 4 must be equivalent to 5 percent of the gross income
that the health carrier earned from conducting business in this
State during the quarter during which a violation described in
subsection 4 is determined to have occurred.
6. The Commissioner may examine the books and records of
a health carrier in order to determine the amount of the civil
penalty that must be assessed against the health carrier pursuant
to subsection 5.
-
*AB295*

– 6 –
7. The Commissioner shall deposit any money recovered as a
civil penalty pursuant to subsection 4 into the Fund for Hospital
Care to Indigent Persons created by NRS 428.175.
8. The Commissioner may establish by regulation additional
sanctions that may be imposed against a health carrier that is
determined to have committed five or more violations of
paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection 2 of NRS 687B.225 or section 7
of this act within any 18-month period.
Sec. 9. NRS 687B.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
687B.225 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
689A.0405, 689A.0412, 689A.0413, 689A.0418, 689A.0437,
689A.044, 689A.0445, 689A.0459, 689B.031, 689B.0312,
689B.0313, 689B.0315, 689B.0317, 689B.0319, 689B.0374,
689B.0378, 689C.1665, 689C.1671, 689C.1675, 689C.1676,
695A.1843, 695A.1856, 695A.1865, 695A.1874, 695B.1912,
695B.1913, 695B.1914, 695B.1919, 695B.19197, 695B.1924,
695B.1925, 695B.1942, 695C.1696, 695C.1699, 695C.1713,
695C.1735, 695C.1737, 695C.1743, 695C.1745, 695C.1751,
695G.170, 695G.1705, 695G.171, 695G.1714, 695G.1715,
695G.1719 and 695G.177, any contract [for group, blanket or
individual] or policy of health insurance [or any contract by a
nonprofit hospital, medical or dental service corporation or
organization for dental care] issued by a health carrier which
provides for payment of a certain part of medical or dental care may
require the insured [or member] to obtain prior authorization for that
care from the [insurer or organization. The insurer or organization]
health carrier in a manner consistent with this section and
sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this act.
2. A health carrier that requires an insured to obtain prior
authorization shall:
(a) File its procedure for obtaining approval of care pursuant to
this section for approval by the Commissioner . [; and]
(b) Unless a shorter time period is prescribed by a specific
statute, including, without limitation, NRS 689A.0446, 689B.0361,
689C.1688, 695A.1859, 695B.19087, 695C.16932 and 695G.1703,
[respond to] and except as otherwise provided by paragraph (c),
approve or make an adverse determination on any request for
approval by the insured [or member] pursuant to this section [within
20 days after it receives the request.] and notify the insured and his
or her provider of health care of the approval or adverse
determination:
(1) For non-urgent medical or dental care, within 5 days
after the request is received; or
(2) For urgent health care, within 48 hours after the
request is received.
-
*AB295*

– 7 –
(c) If the health carrier requires from an insured or a provider
of health care additional, medically relevant information or
documentation in order to adequately evaluate a request for prior
authorization:
(1) Notify the insured and the provider of health care who
submitted the request within the applicable amount of time
described in paragraph (b) that additional information is required
to evaluate the request;
(2) Include within the notification sent pursuant to
subparagraph (1) a description, with reasonable specificity, of the
information that is required by the health carrier; and
(3) Approve or make an adverse determination on the
request:
(I) For non-urgent medical or dental care, within 5 days
after receiving the information.
(II) For urgent health care, within 48 hours after
receiving the information.
[2.] 3. The procedure for prior authorization may not
discriminate among persons licensed to provide the covered care.
4. If a health carrier makes an adverse determination on a
request for prior authorization, the health carrier shall
immediately transmit to the insured to which the request pertains
and his or her provider of health care a written notice that
contains:
(a) A specific description of all reasons that the health carrier
made the adverse determination;
(b) The specific clinical criteria and medical evidence that the
health carrier relied upon to make the adverse determination; and
(c) A description of any mechanism available for the insured
to appeal or challenge the adverse determination, which may
include, without limitation:
(1) An internal appeals process established by the health
carrier, if applicable; or
(2) Options for independent or external review, which may
include, without limitation, the external review process established
pursuant to NRS 695G.241 to 695G.310, inclusive, where
applicable.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if a health
carrier approves a request for prior authorization for a continuous
course of treatment that relates to a chronic or long-term
condition which is specifically identified in the request for prior
authorization, the approval remains valid for 12 months from the
date on which the health carrier approved the request. A health
carrier may require additional prior authorization for medical or
dental care that represents a substantial deviation from the course
-
*AB295*

– 8 –
of treatment indicated in the previous request for prior
authorization that was approved by the health carrier.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Clinical criteria” means any written screening procedure,
decision abstract, clinical protocol or practice guideline used by a
health carrier to determine the necessity and appropriateness of
medical or dental care.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 695G.070.
(c) “Urgent health care” means health care that, in the
opinion of a provider of health care with knowledge of the medical
condition of a patient, if not rendered to the patient within 48
hours could:
(1) Seriously jeopardize the life or health of the patient or
the ability of the patient to regain maximum function; or
(2) Subject the patient to severe pain that cannot be
adequately managed without receiving such care.
Sec. 10. NRS 695B.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695B.320 1. Nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporations are subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to the
provisions of chapters 679A and 679B of NRS, subsections 2, 4, 17,
18 and 30 of NRS 680B.010, NRS 680B.025 to 680B.060,
inclusive, chapter 681B of NRS, NRS 686A.010 to 686A.315,
inclusive, 686B.010 to 686B.175, inclusive, 687B.010 to
687B.040, inclusive, 687B.070 to 687B.140, inclusive, 687B.150,
687B.160, 687B.180, 687B.200 to 687B.255, inclusive, and
sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this act, 687B.270, 687B.310 to
687B.380, inclusive, 687B.410, 687B.420, 687B.430, 687B.500 and
chapters 692B, 692C, 693A and 696B of NRS, to the extent
applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of this
chapter.
2. For the purposes of this section and the provisions set forth
in subsection 1, a nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporation is included in the meaning of the term “insurer.”
Sec. 11. NRS 232.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.320 1. The Director:
(a) Shall appoint, with the consent of the Governor,
administrators of the divisions of the Department, who are
respectively designated as follows:
(1) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division;
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services;
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services;
-
*AB295*

– 9 –
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy; and
(5) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health.
(b) Shall administer, through the divisions of the Department,
the provisions of chapters 63, 424, 425, 427A, 432A to 442,
inclusive, 446 to 450, inclusive, 458A and 656A of NRS, NRS
127.220 to 127.310, inclusive, 422.001 to 422.410, inclusive, and
sections 15 to 19, inclusive, of this act, 422.580, 432.010 to
432.133, inclusive, 432B.6201 to 432B.626, inclusive, 444.002 to
444.430, inclusive, and 445A.010 to 445A.055, inclusive, and all
other provisions of law relating to the functions of the divisions of
the Department, but is not responsible for the clinical activities of
the Division of Public and Behavioral Health or the professional line
activities of the other divisions.
(c) Shall administer any state program for persons with
developmental disabilities established pursuant to the
Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
2000, 42 U.S.C. §§ 15001 et seq.
(d) Shall, after considering advice from agencies of local
governments and nonprofit organizations which provide social
services, adopt a master plan for the provision of human services in
this State. The Director shall revise the plan biennially and deliver a
copy of the plan to the Governor and the Legislature at the
beginning of each regular session. The plan must:
(1) Identify and assess the plans and programs of the
Department for the provision of human services, and any
duplication of those services by federal, state and local agencies;
(2) Set forth priorities for the provision of those services;
(3) Provide for communication and the coordination of those
services among nonprofit organizations, agencies of local
government, the State and the Federal Government;
(4) Identify the sources of funding for services provided by
the Department and the allocation of that funding;
(5) Set forth sufficient information to assist the Department
in providing those services and in the planning and budgeting for the
future provision of those services; and
(6) Contain any other information necessary for the
Department to communicate effectively with the Federal
Government concerning demographic trends, formulas for the
distribution of federal money and any need for the modification of
programs administered by the Department.
(e) May, by regulation, require nonprofit organizations and state
and local governmental agencies to provide information regarding
the programs of those organizations and agencies, excluding
-
*AB295*

– 10 –
detailed information relating to their budgets and payrolls, which the
Director deems necessary for the performance of the duties imposed
upon him or her pursuant to this section.
(f) Has such other powers and duties as are provided by law.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director, or
the Director’s designee, is responsible for appointing and removing
subordinate officers and employees of the Department.
Sec. 12. NRS 287.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.010 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada may:
(a) Adopt and carry into effect a system of group life, accident
or health insurance, or any combination thereof, for the benefit of its
officers and employees, and the dependents of officers and
employees who elect to accept the insurance and who, where
necessary, have authorized the governing body to make deductions
from their compensation for the payment of premiums on the
insurance.
(b) Purchase group policies of life, accident or health insurance,
or any combination thereof, for the benefit of such officers and
employees, and the dependents of such officers and employees, as
have authorized the purchase, from insurance companies authorized
to transact the business of such insurance in the State of Nevada,
and, where necessary, deduct from the compensation of officers and
employees the premiums upon insurance and pay the deductions
upon the premiums.
(c) Provide group life, accident or health coverage through a
self-insurance reserve fund and, where necessary, deduct
contributions to the maintenance of the fund from the compensation
of officers and employees and pay the deductions into the fund. The
money accumulated for this purpose through deductions from the
compensation of officers and employees and contributions of the
governing body must be maintained as an internal service fund as
defined by NRS 354.543. The money must be deposited in a state or
national bank or credit union authorized to transact business in the
State of Nevada. Any independent administrator of a fund created
under this section is subject to the licensing requirements of chapter
683A of NRS, and must be a resident of this State. Any contract
with an independent administrator must be approved by the
Commissioner of Insurance as to the reasonableness of
administrative charges in relation to contributions collected and
benefits provided. The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597,
inclusive, 686A.135, paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 2 and
subsections 4 and 5 of NRS 687B.225, 687B.352, 687B.408,
-
*AB295*

– 11 –
687B.692, 687B.723, 687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.030 to
689B.0317, inclusive, paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 1 of NRS
689B.0319, subsections 2, 4, 6 and 7 of NRS 689B.0319, 689B.033
to 689B.0369, inclusive, 689B.0375 to 689B.050, inclusive,
689B.0675, 689B.265, 689B.287 and 689B.500 and section 6 of
this act apply to coverage provided pursuant to this paragraph,
except that the provisions of NRS 689B.0378, 689B.03785 and
689B.500 only apply to coverage for active officers and employees
of the governing body, or the dependents of such officers and
employees.
(d) Defray part or all of the cost of maintenance of a self-
insurance fund or of the premiums upon insurance. The money for
contributions must be budgeted for in accordance with the laws
governing the county, school district, municipal corporation,
political subdivision, public corporation or other local governmental
agency of the State of Nevada.
2. If a school district offers group insurance to its officers and
employees pursuant to this section, members of the board of trustees
of the school district must not be excluded from participating in the
group insurance. If the amount of the deductions from compensation
required to pay for the group insurance exceeds the compensation to
which a trustee is entitled, the difference must be paid by the trustee.
3. In any county in which a legal services organization exists,
the governing body of the county, or of any school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada in the
county, may enter into a contract with the legal services
organization pursuant to which the officers and employees of the
legal services organization, and the dependents of those officers and
employees, are eligible for any life, accident or health insurance
provided pursuant to this section to the officers and employees, and
the dependents of the officers and employees, of the county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency.
4. If a contract is entered into pursuant to subsection 3, the
officers and employees of the legal services organization:
(a) Shall be deemed, solely for the purposes of this section, to be
officers and employees of the county, school district, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or other local
governmental agency with which the legal services organization has
contracted; and
(b) Must be required by the contract to pay the premiums or
contributions for all insurance which they elect to accept or of which
they authorize the purchase.
5. A contract that is entered into pursuant to subsection 3:
-
*AB295*

– 12 –
(a) Must be submitted to the Commissioner of Insurance for
approval not less than 30 days before the date on which the contract
is to become effective.
(b) Does not become effective unless approved by the
Commissioner.
(c) Shall be deemed to be approved if not disapproved by the
Commissioner within 30 days after its submission.
6. As used in this section, “legal services organization” means
an organization that operates a program for legal aid and receives
money pursuant to NRS 19.031.
Sec. 13. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, 686A.135, paragraphs (b) and (c) of
subsection 2 and subsections 4 and 5 of NRS 687B.225, 687B.352,
687B.409, 687B.692, 687B.723, 687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.0353,
689B.255, 695C.1723, 695G.150, 695G.155, 695G.160, 695G.162,
695G.1635, 695G.164, 695G.1645, 695G.1665, 695G.167,
695G.1675, 695G.170 to 695G.1712, inclusive, 695G.1714 to
695G.174, inclusive, 695G.176, 695G.177, 695G.200 to 695G.230,
inclusive, 695G.241 to 695G.310, inclusive, 695G.405 and
695G.415, and section 6 of this act in the same manner as an
insurer that is licensed pursuant to title 57 of NRS is required to
comply with those provisions.
Sec. 14. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 15 to 19, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 15. 1. The provisions of sections 16 to 19, inclusive, of
this act and any policies developed pursuant thereto do not apply
to the delivery of services to recipients of Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program through managed care in
accordance with NRS 422.273.
2. A health maintenance organization or other managed care
organization that enters into a contract with the Department or the
Division pursuant to NRS 422.273 to provide health care services
to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program shall comply with NRS
687B.225 and sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 16. As used in sections 15 to 19, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, “adverse determination”
means a determination by the Department that an admission,
availability of care, continued stay or other medical care or dental
care that is a covered benefit has been reviewed and, based upon
the information provided, does not meet the Department’s
-
*AB295*

– 13 –
requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness, health care
setting, level of care or effectiveness, and the requested care or
service or payment for the care or service is therefore denied,
reduced or terminated.
Sec. 17. 1. Unless a shorter time period is prescribed by a
specific statute, and except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the Department, with respect to Medicaid and the Children’s
Health Insurance Program, shall approve or make an adverse
determination on a request for prior authorization submitted by or
on behalf of a recipient of Medicaid or the Children’s Health
Insurance Program, as applicable, and notify the recipient and his
or her provider of health care of the approval or adverse
determination:
(a) For non-urgent medical or dental care, within 5 days after
receiving the request.
(b) For urgent health care, within 48 hours after receiving the
request.
2. If the Department requires from a recipient or a provider
of health care additional, medically relevant information or
documentation in order to adequately evaluate a request for prior
authorization, the Department shall:
(a) Notify the recipient and the provider of health care who
submitted the request within the applicable amount of time
described in subsection 1 that additional information is required to
evaluate the request;
(b) Include within the notification sent pursuant to paragraph
(a) a description, with reasonable specificity, of the information
that is required by the Department; and
(c) Approve or make an adverse determination on the request:
(1) For non-urgent medical or dental care, within 5 days
after receiving the information.
(2) For urgent health care, within 48 hours after receiving
the information.
3. If the Department makes an adverse determination on a
request for prior authorization, the Department shall immediately
transmit to the recipient of Medicaid or insurance provided
pursuant to the Children’s Health Insurance Program, as
applicable, to which the request pertains a written notice that
contains:
(a) A specific description of all reasons that the Department
made the adverse determination;
(b) The specific clinical criteria and medical evidence that the
Department relied upon to make the adverse determination; and
(c) A description of any mechanism available for the recipient
to appeal or challenge the adverse determination.
-
*AB295*

– 14 –
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if the
Department approves a request for prior authorization for a
continuous course of treatment that relates to a chronic or long-
term condition which is specifically identified in the request for
prior authorization, the approval remains valid for 12 months
from the date on which the Department approved the request. The
Department may require additional prior authorization for
medical or dental care that represents a substantial deviation from
the course of treatment indicated in the previous request for prior
authorization that was approved by the Department.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Clinical criteria” means any written screening procedure,
decision abstract, clinical protocol or practice guideline used by
the Department to determine the necessity and appropriateness of
medical or dental care.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 695G.070.
(c) “Urgent health care” means health care that, in the
opinion of a provider of health care with knowledge of the medical
condition of a patient, if not rendered to the patient within 48
hours could:
(1) Seriously jeopardize the life or health of the patient or
the ability of the patient to regain maximum function; or
(2) Subject the patient to severe pain that cannot be
adequately managed without receiving such care.
Sec. 18. 1. If the Department utilizes an artificial
intelligence system or automated decision tool to process requests
for prior authorization, the Department shall transmit to each
recipient of Medicaid or insurance pursuant to the Children’s
Health Insurance Program, in writing:
(a) A statement that the Department utilizes an artificial
intelligence system or automated decision tool to process requests
for prior authorization;
(b) A general description of how the artificial intelligence
system or automated decision tool works; and
(c) A description of the specific types of information or data
utilized by the artificial intelligence system or automated decision
tool which enables the system or tool to generate an outcome.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the
Department shall not utilize or employ an artificial intelligence
system or automated decision tool to:
(a) Make an adverse determination on a request for prior
authorization; or
(b) Terminate, reduce or modify coverage for medical or
dental care that was previously approved by the Department.
-
*AB295*

– 15 –
3. The Department may utilize or employ an artificial
intelligence system or automated decision tool for the purposes
described in subsection 2 if, when the artificial intelligence system
or automated decision tool generates an outcome on a request for
prior authorization described in subsection 2, the request for prior
authorization is independently reviewed by a physician or, for a
request for dental care, a dentist, who:
(a) Holds an unrestricted license to practice medicine or
dentistry, as applicable, in any state or territory of the United
States;
(b) Holds a current certification by a specialty board of the
American Board of Medical Specialties or, if a dentist, a certifying
board approved by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the
American Dental Association, in the area or areas appropriate to
the subject of the request; and
(c) Possesses the education, training and expertise to evaluate
the specific clinical issues involved in the request.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Artificial intelligence system” means a machine-based
system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make
predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or
virtual environments.
(b) “Automated decision tool” means an automated or
computerized system that is specifically developed or modified to
make, or to be a controlling factor in making, consequential
decisions.
Sec. 19. 1. On or before March 1 of each calendar year, the
Department shall compile and publish on an Internet website
maintained by the Department a report containing the following
information for the immediately preceding calendar year:
(a) The total number of requests for prior authorization for
care provided to recipients of Medicaid and recipients of
insurance pursuant to the Children’s Health Insurance Program
that were received by the Department.
(b) The average time that elapsed between the Department
receiving a request described in paragraph (a) and the Department
approving or making an adverse determination on the request.
(c) The percentage and total number of requests for prior
authorization described in paragraph (a) that were approved upon
initial review.
(d) The percentage and total number of requests for prior
authorization described in paragraph (a) that resulted in an
adverse determination upon initial review.
(e) The percentage and total number of the adverse
determinations described in paragraph (d) that were appealed.
-
*AB295*

– 16 –
(f) The percentage and total number of appeals described in
paragraph (e) that resulted in the reversal of an adverse
determination.
2. The report compiled pursuant to subsection 1 must present
the information described in that subsection:
(a) In aggregated form; and
(b) Disaggregated by the types of health or dental care at issue
in the requests for prior authorization, which may include, without
limitation, mental health, chronic care, preventive services and
dental care.
Sec. 20. NRS 422.403 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.403 1. The Department shall, by regulation, establish and
manage the use by the Medicaid program of step therapy and prior
authorization for prescription drugs.
2. The Drug Use Review Board shall:
(a) Advise the Department concerning the use by the Medicaid
program of step therapy and prior authorization for prescription
drugs;
(b) Develop step therapy protocols and prior authorization
policies and procedures in a manner consistent with sections 16 to
19, inclusive, of this act for use by the Medicaid program for
prescription drugs; and
(c) Review and approve, based on clinical evidence and best
clinical practice guidelines and without consideration of the cost of
the prescription drugs being considered, step therapy protocols used
by the Medicaid program for prescription drugs.
3. The step therapy protocol established pursuant to this section
must not apply to a drug approved by the Food and Drug
Administration that is prescribed to treat a psychiatric condition of a
recipient of Medicaid, if:
(a) The drug has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration with indications for the psychiatric condition of the
insured or the use of the drug to treat that psychiatric condition is
otherwise supported by medical or scientific evidence;
(b) The drug is prescribed by:
(1) A psychiatrist;
(2) A physician assistant under the supervision of a
psychiatrist;
(3) An advanced practice registered nurse who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the State Board of
Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120; or
(4) A primary care provider that is providing care to an
insured in consultation with a practitioner listed in subparagraph (1),
(2) or (3), if the closest practitioner listed in subparagraph (1), (2) or
-
*AB295*

– 17 –
(3) who participates in Medicaid is located 60 miles or more from
the residence of the recipient; and
(c) The practitioner listed in paragraph (b) who prescribed the
drug knows, based on the medical history of the recipient, or
reasonably expects each alternative drug that is required to be used
earlier in the step therapy protocol to be ineffective at treating the
psychiatric condition.
4. The Department shall not require the Drug Use Review
Board to develop, review or approve prior authorization policies or
procedures necessary for the operation of the list of preferred
prescription drugs developed pursuant to NRS 422.4025.
5. The Department shall accept recommendations from the
Drug Use Review Board as the basis for developing or revising step
therapy protocols and prior authorization policies and procedures
used by the Medicaid program for prescription drugs.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical or scientific evidence” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.053.
(b) “Step therapy protocol” means a procedure that requires a
recipient of Medicaid to use a prescription drug or sequence of
prescription drugs other than a drug that a practitioner recommends
for treatment of a psychiatric condition of the recipient before
Medicaid provides coverage for the recommended drug.
Sec. 21. NRS 608.1555 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.1555 Any employer who provides benefits for health care
to his or her employees shall provide the same benefits and pay
providers of health care in the same manner as a policy of insurance
pursuant to chapters 689A and 689B of NRS, including, without
limitation, as required by paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 2
and subsections 4 and 5 of NRS 687B.225, NRS 687B.409,
687B.723 and 687B.725 [.] and section 6 of this act.
Sec. 22. 1. The amendatory provisions of this act do not
apply to a request for prior authorization submitted:
(a) Under any contract or policy of health insurance issued by a
health carrier before January 1, 2026, but apply to any request for
prior authorization submitted under any renewal of such a contract
or policy; or
(b) To the Department of Health and Human Services before
January 1, 2026, for dental or medical care provided to a recipient of
Medicaid or insurance pursuant to the Children’s Health Insurance
Program, as applicable.
2. A health carrier must, in order to continue requiring prior
authorization in contracts or policies of health insurance issued or
renewed on or after January 1, 2026:
-
*AB295*

– 18 –
(a) Develop a procedure for obtaining prior authorization that
complies with NRS 687B.225, as amended by section 9 of this act,
and section 6 of this act; and
(b) Obtain the approval of the Commissioner of Insurance
pursuant to NRS 687B.225, as amended by section 9 of this act, for
the procedure developed pursuant to paragraph (a).
3. As used in this section, “health carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 23. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 24. 1. This section and section 22 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 21, inclusive, and 23 of this act become
effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB295*